Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 29. Drainage Districts with Local Commissioners
§ 51-29-95.
Ditches may cross highways and railroads.

The commissioners of the district shall have the right and power to carry the ditches, either main or lateral, across any highway; and the board of supervisors shall construct suitable bridges across such ditches.

Such ditches may also be carried under or through any railroad track or tramway, and in such event the commissioners of the drainage district shall notify the railroad company or owner of said tramway or telegraph or telephone companies, operating lines of telegraph or telephone under or through which it is proposed to carry such ditches, of the probable time at which the contractor will be ready to enter upon the right of way of any of said companies and construct the work thereon. It shall thereupon be the duty of any said companies or owners of said lines of railway, telegraph, or telephone to send a representative to view the ground with the superintendent of construction, or other person appointed by the commissioners, and arrange the exact time at which the said work can be most conveniently done. At the time agreed upon, said railroads or owners thereof shall remove all rails, ties, stringers, and such other obstructions as may be necessary, and such owners of telegraph and telephone lines shall remove all wires, poles, and other obstructions as may be necessary, to permit the excavation of a channel or channels through its right of way. The work so done shall be planned and conducted so as to interfere in the least possible manner with the business of said railroad, telegraph, and telephone companies. In case any of such persons or corporations refuse and fail to remove any of said obstructions and to allow the construction of the work through its right of way, it shall be held as delaying the construction of a public work and improvement, and shall be liable to a penalty not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day of delay thereof and all damages sustained by the district or contractor, to be recovered in any court having jurisdiction. Such penalty shall inure to the drainage district, and such damages shall inure to the person, firm, or district damaged. An itemized bill of the expenses of the railroad company for opening its track shall be made and presented to the commissioners of the district at some day previous to the day set for passing through said right of way, and a like itemized bill of expense attending the removal of wires and poles of telegraph and telephone companies shall be so presented, including all damages that will be sustained by any of said companies by the construction of said work. Thereupon the board of commissioners shall allow and pay such part thereof as it sees fit and proper, from which allowance either of said companies shall have the right of appeal to the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation; but such appeal shall not operate so as to prevent the drainage commissioners from constructing the proposed work through the rights of way of any of said companies.

This section shall not, however, conflict in any way with the right of eminent domain or the laws relating thereto, but is meant to be operative under and in connection with other provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4474; 1930, § 4495; 1942, § 4721; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269.

§ 51-29-97.
Financial statement and audit.

Within sixty (60) days after the end of the fiscal year following the organization of said drainage district, and annually thereafter, the commissioners shall prepare and retain a copy of a sworn statement of the financial condition of the district to cover the preceding fiscal year. The report shall contain, among other things, a statement of the cash on hand the first of the year for which the report is made, together with all other assets of the district; the total receipts of the preceding year; the disbursement for administration, for construction, for maintenance, for bonds redeemed, and for interest due on outstanding bonds, together with all other indebtedness of the district. The commissioners are further authorized and empowered to do any and all things incident to the management and affairs and business of the district.

The State Auditor of Public Accounts or his assistant may annually audit the books, financial report and expenditures of the commission in the same manner that such officer audits other boards and commissions; and the same powers and duties which such officer exercises or enjoys with respect to other boards and commissions shall be exercised and performed in the same manner in his audit of drainage district commissions. A fee of not exceeding Thirty Dollars ($30.00) per man hour for the time required to conduct each audit shall be paid by each drainage district audited under this section. All such fees shall be paid into the State Department of Audit Fund. Upon the recommendation of the Director of the State Department of Audit, the State Auditor shall appoint auditors on a temporary or permanent status to perform drainage district audits. The State Auditor shall not audit dormant districts which have no income or disbursements during any year.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4476; 1930, § 4497; 1942, § 4723; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1958, ch. 459; Laws, 1964, ch. 211, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 10; Laws, 2008, ch. 558, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 51-29-99.
Penalty for obstructing or damaging drains.

Any person who shall obstruct a drain or damage drainage work provided for by this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction thereof, be fined not more than one hundred dollars nor less than ten dollars; and he shall also be liable to the district for double the cost of removing such obstruction or repairing such damage.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4477; 1930, § 4498; 1942, § 4724; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-101.
Contractors may pass over private lands.

The commissioners, engineers, and contractors, with their teams and outfits engaged in drainage work, shall have the right to pass over all the lands of others to and from the district, being liable to the owner for any damage done thereto. Any owner who shall prevent such passage over his lands shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined one hundred dollars for each day that he prevents such passage.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4479; 1930, § 4500; 1942, § 4726; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-103.
Procedure for districts to come under this chapter.

Any district which has heretofore been organized, including swamp land districts, or which may hereafter be organized under other statutes, may become a district under the terms of this chapter as follows:

If a third of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage or a majority of the landowners owning a third of the acreage of real property within any such district shall petition the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, to constitute them a drainage district under the terms hereof, the clerk of the chancery court shall give notice of the application by two weeks’ publication in some newspaper published and having a bona fide circulation in the county or counties in which the lands of said district lie, stating the time when said petition will be heard and the object of said petition. All owners of real property within the district shall have the right to appear and contest the said petition, or support the same. The chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, shall hear the evidence and shall either grant the petition or deny the same, as he may deem it most advantageous to the property owners of the district and to the public benefit. If he grants the petition, the said district shall have all the rights and powers and be subject to all the obligations and provisions provided by the terms of this chapter. If the majority of the landowners or the majority of the owners of the acreage therein petition for the adoption of this chapter, the court or chancellor must make an order declaring that such district shall henceforth be governed by the terms of this chapter, and shall appoint commissioners according to its terms, who shall carry into effect without delay the proposed drainage improvements.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4480; 1930, § 4501; 1942, § 4727; Laws, 1912, ch. 195; Laws, 1914, ch. 269; Laws, 1956, ch. 349.

§ 51-29-105.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote the ditching, drainage, and reclamation of wet, swampy, and overflowed lands. The collection of assessments hereunder shall not be defeated by reason of any omission, imperfection, or defect in the organization of any district or in the proceedings occurring prior to the judgment of the court confirming assessment of benefits and damages; but said judgment shall be conclusive that all prior proceedings were regular and according to law. In case any assessment shall be held to be void for want of notice, the said commissioners may, upon motion, be permitted to give such owner due notice and ask for a time to be set by the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, for hearing any and all objections that said landowner may have to such proceedings and the assessment. The chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, at such time may make such orders in reference thereto as justice may require, and may assess such landowner his just proportion of the benefits received by him by such proposed work or the damages suffered by him by such proposed work; and thereupon such assessment as to such land shall be binding and conclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4481; 1930, § 4502; 1942, § 4728; Laws, 1914, ch. 269.

§ 51-29-107.
Special commissioner may hear and determine cases under this chapter.

All hearings hereinbefore provided to be heard before the chancellor may be heard before a special commissioner who may be appointed by the chancellor, who shall have full authority to make all findings of law and of fact, and whose findings shall be reduced to writing and reported to the chancellor for confirmation either in term-time or in vacation. Such reports shall be subject to exceptions or objections, but no notice of the hearing of such exceptions shall be necessary, provided the date for hearing exceptions to the commissioner’s report shall have been fixed in the order referring the matter to the commissioner. Such commissioner shall receive such compensation as may be allowed him by the chancellor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4482; 1930, § 4503; 1942, § 4729; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-109.
Expenses of chancellor to be paid by district.

As a part of the cost of the organization and conduct of a drainage district, the chancellor may tax his own traveling and hotel expenses in deciding all hearings provided for in this chapter, when such hearings are had before the chancellor in vacation. Such traveling expenses shall be paid to the chancellor upon his filing an itemized statement thereof with the said drainage commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4483; 1930, § 4504; 1942, § 4730; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-111.
Method to apportion benefits when land is divided into smaller units of ownership.

In case assessment of benefits of a drainage district organized and operating under the provisions of this chapter is set up on the assessment roll of such drainage district by government survey subdivisions and any such land is thereafter conveyed so that the separate ownership thereof is in lesser quantities or units than that as set up on such assessment roll, or in case such assessed subdivision is divided into lesser fractions in its ownership so that there are several separate ownerships of the originally assessed subdivision and it is necessary that the said assessment and tax thereon be apportioned among the several owners thereof, the board of drainage commissioners in which such land is situated, at the request of any such owner or on its own motion, may by an order spread on its minutes apportion the assessment of benefit thereof to the several parts or fractions of such originally assessed government survey subdivision so as to provide on the assessment rolls for the particular land upon which the several owners thereof may pay the tax thereon; provided that the apportionment of such tax shall never increase or diminish the total assessment of such originally assessed government survey subdivision as set up on the assessment rolls of such district or impair in any wise the lien of the bonds or obligations of said district as issued against the same. Before any such change may be made, the clerk of the board of drainage commissioners shall give notice that such action is sought to be taken, which notice shall be published in a weekly newspaper published in the county in which such land is situated for three weeks preceding the meeting at which such action is to be taken. This notice shall state that it is proposed that such board will apportion the assessment of benefits as set up on the assessment rolls of the named drainage district on the date to be named at the place to be named, and shall carry a description of the lands to be affected as well as the name of the owner thereof as set up on said assessment roll. Such notice by publication, as provided herein, shall also be directed to all bondholders or persons interested in said drainage district or the lands embraced therein, and shall specifically give the date and place of said meeting. Upon the hearing of said matter before such drainage commissioners and all objections thereto, any party, person, firm, corporation, bondholder, other landowners within the drainage district, or persons in any wise interested or affected by the decision of such drainage commissioners in apportioning or refusing to apportion such assessment may appeal from the decision of such drainage commissioners by giving written notice to the said drainage commissioners within fifteen days after their decision. Such appeal shall be to the chancery court of the county in which the land involved shall be situated, and if the land involved is situated in more than one county, then to the chancery court of either county. When such appeal is requested by any party interested, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of drainage commissioners to file with the chancery clerk the petitions requesting the tax apportionment and all papers in connection with the cause, within thirty days after the request of said appeal, if made within the time hereinabove required. The chancery clerk shall file said papers and docket the case as any other cause in the chancery court, and it shall be heard accordingly. Costs shall be taxed as any other cases in the chancery court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4505; 1942, § 4731; Laws, 1926, ch. 302.

§ 51-29-113.
Clerk of district to certify order to tax collector.

Should an appeal not be perfected within fifteen days after the decision of the board of drainage commissioners, or upon the final decision of the courts upon appeal, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the drainage district to immediately certify a copy of said order to the tax collector, showing the change and apportionment of such assessments; and such tax collector shall be guided thereby in making future collections of such assessments and tax. Such change in such assessment as made shall be deemed in law to be the amount of such assessment and tax to be due on the land as fixed by such order, and such lands shall not thereafter be liable for any amount above its apportioned part thereof. Such tax collector may issue receipt upon the payment by any party of such amount as has been apportioned to be due on any subdivision of land under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4506; 1942, § 4732; Laws, 1926, ch. 302.

§ 51-29-115.
Formation of subdrainage districts.

Subdistricts may be formed under this chapter in the following manner: When one third of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage or a majority of the landowners owning a third of the acreage or real property within a proposed subdistrict, composed of lands wholly within a district or partly within and partly without such district, shall petition the chancery court to establish a subdistrict to embrace their property, describing generally the region which it is intended shall be embraced within the subdistrict, and shall file a good bond to pay for the expenses of the survey of the proposed subdistrict in case the district is not formed, it shall be the duty of the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, to enter an order directing the commissioners of the main district to forthwith proceed to cause a survey to be made and to ascertain the limits of the region which will be benefited by a proposed system of improvements, giving a general idea of its character and the costs of drainage, and making such suggestions as to the size of the drainage ditches and their location as the commissioners may deem advisable, and to file their report with the clerk of the chancery court. All expenses of preparing such plans and estimates and costs of publication shall be paid by the board of supervisors, as the work progresses, upon proper showing by the commissioners of said district; but all expenses incurred by said subdistrict shall be repaid out of the proceeds of the first money received by the proposed subdistrict.

The clerk of the chancery court shall thereupon give notice by publication for two weeks by two insertions in some newspaper published in the county or counties in which said subdistrict will be located, calling upon all persons owning real property within said subdistrict to appear before the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, on some day fixed by said clerk not less than ten days after the last publication to show cause in favor of or against the establishing of the subdistrict. If it shall appear to the court or chancellor that the organization of the proposed subdistrict will conduce to the public benefit and to the interest of real property therein, it shall make an order upon its records establishing said subdistrict. Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit the formation and organization of a drainage district wholly or partly within a district already organized. A district independent of the district already organized may be organized where a part or all of the lands are not in the district already organized, provided that a third of the landowners owning a majority of the acreage or a majority of the landowners owning a third of the acreage or real property within such proposed district shall petition the chancery court of any county of such district to constitute them a drainage district under the terms of this chapter, and thereupon proceedings shall be had in all respects in conformity with this chapter for the creation of a drainage district under its terms. When such a district is organized as now provided by law for the organization of drainage districts, it shall have all the rights, powers, and privileges of any other district, having its commissioners and other officers selected in the manner now provided by law; and such district shall have full power to make and levy assessments, issue bonds independent of any other district, and to do all other things now provided by law for the formation and organization of drainage districts. When any such district is organized, the several parcels of land thereof that are included within the corporate limits of any district shall still be liable to the district already organized for assessments for benefits thereafter levied, if any are received by them; and in like manner shall receive credit for any work done which is a benefit to the district already organized. The foregoing provisions of this chapter shall apply to the organization of the subdistrict, the same as to the organization of the district.

When the court or chancellor has established a subdistrict, he shall appoint the commissioners of the subdistrict; and the proceedings thereafter shall conform in all respects to the provisions of this chapter relating to the drainage district. Said commissioners are empowered and authorized to issue bonds of said subdistrict, and said bonds shall be designated as the bonds of said subdistrict; and all the foregoing provisions of this chapter in reference to the issuance of the bonds of said drainage district shall apply to and govern the issuance of bonds of each particular subdistrict. The proceeds of the sale or money obtained on the bonds of any subdistrict shall be used and applied exclusively to the work of constructing and maintaining the internal drains of said subdistrict in the carrying out and perfecting its internal drains. Separate accounts shall be kept by the treasurer and depositories of said commission with each subdrainage district, so that there can be seen at all times the exact financial condition of each subdistrict, both as to its receipts and disbursements.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4484; 1930, § 4511; 1942, § 4737; Laws, 1916, ch. 243; Laws, 1920, ch. 288.

§ 51-29-117.
Manner of appeal.

Whenever an appeal is allowed to be prosecuted under this chapter, the same shall be taken within the time fixed by this chapter. If the appeal be from an order of the board of supervisors, same shall be perfected in the same manner as an appeal from orders of the board of supervisors approving tax assessment. If the appeal be from an order of the chancery court or chancellor in vacation, such appeal shall be prosecuted in like manner as is provided by law for the prosecution of appeals from other decrees of said court, but must be within the time fixed by this chapter for appealing.

No appeal herein provided for shall be allowed to delay the organization of the district, or the progress of the work or improvement.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4475, 4486; 1930, §§ 4496, 4512; 1942, §§ 4722, 4738; Laws, 1912, ch. 195.

§ 51-29-119.
Additional powers given to certain drainage districts.

Any drainage district operating under the provisions of this chapter, having as its purpose and object a comprehensive and general plan to control overflow and surplus water of rivers and their tributaries, is hereby given the power, in addition to the foregoing powers given by this chapter, to construct and maintain by-passes for conveying surplus and overflow waters by means of ditches, canals, floodways, levees, conduits, or other artificial means by shorter and more direct route from tributaries of natural streams and their watersheds to their main water course, and from one point in a natural water course to another point therein. However, said by-passes, ditches, canals, floodways, levees, or conduits shall empty the water directly into the same watercourse to which it would naturally flow.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4513; 1942, § 4739; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-121.
Assessments to be apportioned when land lies in certain districts.

Whenever such districts include within their boundaries land already included in an existing drainage district, such land in the existing district shall remain liable for benefits already assessed or that may thereafter be assessed by such existing district, and shall also be liable to be assessed for benefits by the new district as now provided by law; but such land in an existing district may, for any of its improvements used by the new district, be given credit against the assessment of benefits levied by the new district to the amount of its pro rata portion of all the bonded and outstanding indebtedness, including interest to accrue upon such bonds and indebtedness of such existing district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4514; 1942, § 4740; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-123.
Certain districts may own rights of way and dispose of same.

Such district shall have the right to acquire and own in fee simple, within the confines of such district, all necessary rights of way for floodways, by-passes, ditches, canals, levees, and other necessary work or improvements, by purchase or condemnation as now provided by law within the district; and it may sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of same, subject to drainage purposes and easements of the district, or it may rent or lease for cash, or part of crops, such parts of its right of way as are susceptible of growing and producing crops, the income therefrom to be used for the maintenance of the improvements of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4515; 1942, § 4741; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-125.
Certain districts may acquire rights of way through existing districts.

Such districts may acquire such rights of way through existing drainage districts, after obtaining consent of an existing district and upon such terms as the existing district may impose, but when the works or improvements of an existing district are so acquired, the district acquiring shall furnish and provide equivalent relief or protection to that destroyed or impaired by such taking. If not determined by mutual agreement by the commissioners of the districts or landowners, either district may petition the board of supervisors, chancellor, or chancery court having jurisdiction to investigate, determine, and adjudicate what damages shall be paid, or what work or relief shall be done or provided by the new district. Such judgment may be enforced by mandamus, as now provided by law, and all existing rights of landowners in an existing district shall be protected and cared for by such new district. An appeal shall lie from such order as provided by this chapter. Such district may use any ditch, levee, or other improvements of an existing drainage district with the consent of the commissioners thereof, and upon such terms, conditions, stipulations, and price as may be made by such existing drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4516; 1942, § 4742; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-127.
Districts acquiring certain lands to assume obligations.

When lands in an existing district, and which have been assessed for benefits, are acquired for rights of way by such districts for canals, ditches, levees, floodways, by-passes, or other necessary drainage purposes, assessments already levied or that may be levied against such land to pay its proportion of outstanding bonds or other obligations of the existing district, including all interest to accrue thereon, shall be assumed and paid by the new district so taking or so acquiring such land, in the proportion that its value, as fixed by condemnation, shall bear to the value of the land included in the entire district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4517; 1942, § 4743; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-129.
Law with reference to disposition of waters.

Nothing contained in Sections 51-29-119 through 51-29-129 shall be construed to permit the enlargement of any prescriptive rights now or hereafter existing or acquired, nor permit the diversion of water from one watershed or basin to another watershed or basin. Nor shall said sections apply to or affect, change, modify, or alter the law as now existing relative to the diversion and control of seep water, and they shall not be construed to repeal, amend, or modify any existing laws, but shall be deemed as supplemental to the law as it now exists.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4518; 1942, § 4744; Laws, 1924, ch. 257.

§ 51-29-131.
Enlargement of boundaries of drainage districts.

If ten per cent of the landowners owning lands adjoining or adjacent to any existing district operating under the provisions of this chapter shall petition the chancery court to extend the boundaries of any such existing district, describing generally the region which it is intended shall be embraced within the boundaries of such drainage district as extended, it shall be the duty of the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, to enter an order directing the commissioners of such drainage district to forthwith proceed to cause a survey to be made, and to ascertain the limits of the region which will be benefited by the proposed system of improvements, giving a general idea of its character and the cost of drainage and other improvements necessary and making such suggestions as to the size of the drainage ditches and their location and of levees, dams, and pumping stations, if any of such be necessary, to properly drain and protect said territory, or if the commissioners may deem such levees, dams, pumping stations, or any or either of them advisable, and to file their reports with the clerk of the chancery court. All expenses of making such survey, preparing the plans and estimates of the costs of the improvements, costs of publication, attorneys’ fees, and other necessary expenses shall be paid as the work progresses by the existing drainage district to which the land and territory is proposed to be added, or by the board of supervisors as the court or chancellor may order. All such expenses shall be repaid out of the first money received from taxes upon the additional lands embraced in such drainage district, or from the sale of bonds from the district as extended, if that be done; but if that be not done, then the board of supervisors shall levy an ad valorem tax upon the land which it was proposed to add to such existing drainage district to repay the costs advanced by such existing drainage district or the board of supervisors, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487a; 1930, § 4519; 1942, § 4745; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-133.
Notice and hearing of proposed extension.

When such reports are filed, the clerk of the chancery court shall thereupon give notice for two weeks by two insertions in some newspaper published in the county or counties in which the land proposed to be included in and added to the existing drainage district is located, calling upon all persons owning the land within the said territory to appear before the chancery court, or chancellor in vacation, not less than ten days after the last publication of said notice to show cause in favor of or against the extension of the boundaries of said district so as to include and embrace their lands therein. If it shall appear to the court or chancellor that the extension of the boundaries of said drainage district, so as to include the additional territory and the construction of the proposed improvements, will be conducive to the public health, to the public benefit, and to the interest of the land and the owners thereof, he shall enter an order extending the boundaries of said drainage district so as to embrace and include said territory, and establishing the same as a part of said existing drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487b; 1930, § 4520; 1942, § 4746; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-135.
Extension of district on majority petition.

If the majority of the landowners owning one third of the acreage of the lands or one third of the landowners owning a majority in acreage of the lands proposed to be added to the existing drainage district shall petition the chancery court of any county in which any part of the land lies to extend the boundaries of the existing drainage district so as to embrace and include their lands, proceedings shall be held in all respects in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487c; 1930, § 4521; 1942, § 4747; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-137.
Rights and powers of extended district.

When the boundaries of the existing drainage district are extended so as to embrace and include additional territory and land, said district shall have all the rights, powers, and privileges so far as said land is concerned as said district had of the lands originally embraced and included therein, and shall have full power to make and levy assessments thereon and to issue additional bonds, as is now provided by law for the formation and organization of drainage districts under the provisions of this chapter. When the boundaries of any existing drainage district are extended and additional lands and territory added thereto to be drained and improved, the several parcels of land of such drainage districts as were included within the limits of the district as originally organized and formed shall be liable to the district as already organized for assessments of benefits to be thereafter levied, if any benefits are received by them; and in like manner shall receive credit for any work done or improvements made or constructed by the district as already organized, which will benefit the land and territory added thereto in the manner herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487d; 1930, § 4522; 1942, § 4748; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-139.
Extension may include lands of other drainage districts.

Nothing contained in Sections 51-29-131 through 51-29-143 shall be construed as preventing the inclusion, in the boundaries of the drainage district to be extended, of any lands embraced in any other existing drainage district. Any such lands shall be and remain liable to the drainage district in which such land is located for assessments for benefits thereafter levied, by the new district as extended, if any benefits are received by them; and in like manner shall receive credit for any work done, or improvements made, which will benefit the land added to the drainage district as extended.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487e; 1930, § 4523; 1942, § 4749; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-141.
Separate accounts kept for extended districts.

Separate accounts shall be kept by the treasurer and depositories for such extended districts, so as to show receipts and disbursements from and on account of the land embraced in the district as originally formed, and also from the land embraced in the territory added to such districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487f; 1930, § 4524; 1942, § 4750; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-143.
Provisions applicable to extended districts.

All the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the organization and operation of extended existing drainage districts, as authorized by the provisions of Sections 51-29-131 through 51-29-143, in so far as the same are or can be made applicable.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 4487g; 1930, § 4525; 1942, § 4751; Laws, 1920, ch. 281.

§ 51-29-145.
Consolidation of districts.

The board of commissioners of any drainage district of the State of Mississippi organized and existing under and by virtue of this chapter, which embraces lands in three or more counties in the State of Mississippi and which supplies an outlet for the water of three or more drainage districts draining tributary streams, in its discretion may, by resolution adopted at any meeting of said board and spread upon its official minutes, declare its proposal and intent to combine the territory of all of the drainage districts for which it supplies a drainage outlet, hereinafter referred to as tributary drainage districts, with the territory of the district supplying said outlet so as to form a single consolidated drainage district embracing the territory of all of the said drainage districts to be under the governing authority of a single board.

The same discretionary authority shall also be vested in the board of commissioners of a drainage district of the State of Mississippi meeting the following qualifications:

That it was organized and is existing under and by virtue of this chapter;

That it is located in two counties in the State of Mississippi, one of which has a population in accordance with the last previous federal census of less than 20,000 and an assessed value on the basis of the 1930-1954 assessment rolls placing it in class 5, and the other of which has a population of less than 20,000 and an assessed value on the basis of the 1930-1954 assessment rolls placing it in class 6, where the combined area of all the drainage districts proposed to be consolidated is less than 24,000 acres; and

That it supplies an outlet for the water of one or more drainage districts through which there runs a continuous drainage canal shared by said districts and providing a combined drainage system for said districts.

Also, the same discretionary authority is vested in the board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district of the State of Mississippi located in one or more counties meeting only the qualifications of subsection (a) of this section whose drainage canal supplies an outlet for the water of one or more tributary drainage districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4752-01; Laws, 1950, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 458; Laws, 1960, 178.